Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1011
Loan; use; limitation.

Any customer obtaining a loan pursuant to sections 66-1001 to 66-1011 shall only use the funds to accomplish the purposes agreed upon at the time of the loan. This section shall not be construed to prohibit an owner or renter from providing services himself or herself to accomplish the agreed-upon purposes. If the borrower of any funds obtained pursuant to sections 66-1001 to 66-1011 uses such funds in a manner or for a purpose not authorized by this section, the total amount of the loan shall immediately become due and payable.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 24.